src/morphology/stems/altstem-adjectives.lexc
!LEXICON A_
!! elin
!n   A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
!n:me    A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
!n:m     A_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
!n   A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
!n:me    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
!n:m A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
!n:m A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
!n   A_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
!n:m A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! heitin
!in   A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
!in:time    A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
!in:tim     A_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
!in   A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
!in:time    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
!in:tim A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
!in:tim A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
!in   A_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
!in:tim A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! puin
!in   A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!in:kime    A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
!in:kim     A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
!in   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
!in:kime    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
!in:kim A_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
!in:kim A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
!in   A_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
!in:kim A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! pyyhin
!in   A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
!in:kime    A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
!in:kim     A_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
!in   A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
!in:kime    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
!in:kim A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
!in:kim A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
!in   A_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
!in:kim A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! raavin
!vin   A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!vin:pime    A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
!vin:pim     A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
!vin   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
!vin:pime    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
!vin:pim A_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
!vin:pim A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
!vin   A_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
!vin:pim A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! särvin
!vin   A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
!vin:pime    A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
!vin:pim     A_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
!vin   A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
!vin:pime    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
!vin:pim A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
!vin:pim A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
!vin   A_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
!vin:pim A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! vaadin
!din   A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!din:time    A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
!din:tim     A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
!din   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
!din:time    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
!din:tim A_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
!din:tim A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
!din   A_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
!din:tim A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! säädin
!din   A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
!din:time    A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
!din:tim     A_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
!din   A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
!din:time    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
!din:tim A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
!din:tim A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
!din   A_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
!din:tim A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
!
!
!LEXICON A_
!! askellin
!lin   A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!lin:time    A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
!lin:tim     A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
!lin   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
!lin:time    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
!lin:tim A_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
!lin:tim A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
!lin   A_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
!lin:tim A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! sivellin
!lin   A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
!lin:time    A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
!lin:tim     A_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
!lin   A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
!lin:time    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
!lin:tim A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
!lin:tim A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
!lin   A_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
!lin:tim A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! käännin
!nin   A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
!nin:time    A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
!nin:tim     A_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
!nin   A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
!nin:time    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
!nin:tim A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
!nin:tim A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
!nin   A_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
!nin:tim A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! muunnin
!nin   A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!nin:time    A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
!nin:tim     A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
!nin   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
!nin:time    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
!nin:tim A_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
!nin:tim A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
!nin   A_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
!nin:tim A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! kiharrin
!rin   A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!rin:time    A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
!rin:tim     A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
!rin   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
!rin:time    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
!rin:tim A_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
!rin:tim A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
!rin   A_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
!rin:tim A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! kierrin
!rin   A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
!rin:time    A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
!rin:tim     A_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
!rin   A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
!rin:time    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
!rin:tim A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
!rin:tim A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
!rin   A_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
!rin:tim A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! poljin
!jin   A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!jin:kime    A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
!jin:kim     A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
!jin   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
!jin:kime    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
!jin:kim A_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
!jin:kim A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
!jin   A_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
!jin:kim A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
!
LEXICON A_HAPAN
!! hapan
an  A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
an:pama    A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
an:pam     A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
an     A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
an:pama    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN ;
an:pam     A_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
an:pam     A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
an     A_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
an:pam A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;

LEXICON A_ALASTON
!! alaston
0:n A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ma    A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:m     A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:n   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:ma    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN ;
0:m     A_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:m     A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:ma    A_BACK_GENITIVE_IN ;
0:n   A_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0:m A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:ma    A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:m    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_VIATON
!! viaton
0:n A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:toma    A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:tom     A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:n   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:toma    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN ;
0:tom     A_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:tom     A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:toma    A_BACK_GENITIVE_IN ;
0:n   A_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0:tom A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:oma    A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:om    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_LEUATTOMAT
!! viaton
0:tom     A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:tom     A_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:tom     A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:toma    A_BACK_GENITIVE_IN ;
0:n   A_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0:tom A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:oma    A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:om    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_KYVYTÖN
!! työtön
0:n A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:tömä    A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:töm     A_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:n   A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:tömä    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN ;
0:töm     A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:töm     A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:tömä    A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN ;
0:n   A_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0:töm A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:ömä    A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:öm    A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_LÄMMIN
!! lämmin
0:n A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:mpimä   A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:mpim    A_FRONT_PLURALS ;
0:n A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:mpimä   A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN ;
0:mpim    A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:mpim    A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:n A_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0:mpim   A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN ;
0:mpim    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:mpimä    A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:mpim    A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_PAHIN
!! alin
0:n A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:mpa   A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:mma   A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:mp    A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:mm    A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:n A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:mpa   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN ;
0:mp    A_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:mp    A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:n A_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0:mpa   A_BACK_GENITIVE_IN ;
0:mp    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:mma    A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:mm    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_SISIN
!! ylin
0:n A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:mpä   A_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:mmä   A_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:mp    A_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:mm    A_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:n A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:mpä   A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN ;
0:mp    A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:mp    A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:n A_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0:mpä   A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN ;
0:mp    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:mmä    A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:mp    A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;
!
LEXICON A_VASEN
!! vasen
0:n A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:mpa   A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:mma   A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:mp    A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:mm    A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:n A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
mpa A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A ;
0:mpa   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN ;
0:mp    A_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:mp    A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:n A_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0:mpa   A_BACK_GENITIVE_IN ;
0:mp    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:mma    A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:mm    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_AAKKOSELLINEN
!! aakkostaminen
0:nen A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:se  A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:s   A_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:s   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:se  A_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:s   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:s   A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:s   A_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0:s   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:se  A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:s   A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN
!! kylkiäinen
0:nen A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:se  A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:s   A_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:s   A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:se  A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:s   A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:s   A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:s   A_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0:s   A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:se    A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:s    A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;

!LEXICON A_
!! vakuutus
!s   A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!s:kse   A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
!s:ks    A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
!s   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
!s:kse   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
!s:ks    A_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
!s:ks    A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
!s       A_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
!s:ks    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;

LEXICON A_SYMPPIS
!! räjäytys
0:s A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:kse   A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:ks    A_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:s A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:kse   A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:ks    A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:ks    A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:s     A_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0:ks    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:kse    A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:ks    A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;

!LEXICON A_
!! aakkosellisuus
!0:s A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!0:te   A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
!0:de   A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
!0:ks    A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
!0:t   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
!0:te   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
!0:ks    A_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
!0:ks    A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
!0:ks    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
!0:de    A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
!0:ks    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_LÄHTEISYYS
!! köyhyys
0:s A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:te   A_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:de   A_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ks    A_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:t   A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:te   A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:ks    A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:ks    A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:ks    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:de    A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:ks    A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_AUTUAS
!! patsas
0:s A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:a A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0 A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:s A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:a A_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
0 A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0 A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0 A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:a    A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_VALMIS
!! kaunis
0:s A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:i A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0 A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:s A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:i A_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
0 A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0 A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0 A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:i    A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_TYÖLÄS
!! työläs
0:s A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ä A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0 A_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:s A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:ä A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
0 A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
0 A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0 A_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0 A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0 A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ä    A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0    A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;
